Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE A. HIGHER EDUCATION IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 51A. ONLINE INSTITUTION RESUMES FOR INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 51A.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Coordinating board" means the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(2) "General academic teaching institution," "institution of higher education," "medical and dental unit," "public state college," and "public technical institute" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51A.002. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COORDINATING BOARD RELATING TO INSTITUTION RESUMES; GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR INSTITUTION RESUMES. (a) The coordinating board, in consultation with each institution of higher education to which this chapter applies, shall develop and maintain online resumes for each of those institutions.

(b) The coordinating board shall:

(1) request from each institution of higher education to which this chapter applies any information the coordinating board considers necessary for the coordinating board to include information or calculate data required to be included in the institution's resume;

(2) establish for each institution of higher education to which this chapter applies a list of representative in-state and out-of-state peer institutions and maintain that list on the coordinating board's Internet website;

(3) ensure that each of an institution of higher education's online resumes:

(A) is available to the public on the coordinating board's Internet website, in a one-page format if possible, and is accessible through a link that appears on the first frame of the coordinating board's Internet website home page in a font that is larger than the font of the majority of the text on the home page;

(B) uses enhanced, user-friendly search capabilities to ensure that the information required to be included in the resume is easily accessible to the persons for whom the resume is designed; and

(C) includes a clearly identifiable link to information on the coordinating board's Internet website regarding the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(4) ensure that the information provided in each resume is accurate and up to date and includes the most recent data available for out-of-state peer institutions.

(c) The coordinating board may modify, as the coordinating board considers necessary, national data regarding an institution's out-of-state peer institutions to ensure uniformity in the comparison of that data to data regarding the institution for which the resume is created and the institution's in-state peer institutions in a resume under this chapter.

(d) The coordinating board is not required to include in the resume any category of information that is unavailable to the coordinating board.

(e) The data relating to student loans, grants, or scholarships included by the coordinating board on an institution's resume under this subchapter must be the same as that published in regard to the institution by the United States Department of Education on its "College Navigator" website, or a successor or related website maintained by the United States Department of Education.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51A.003. DUTIES OF INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION RELATING TO INSTITUTION RESUMES. Each institution of higher education to which this chapter applies shall:

(1) submit to the coordinating board any information requested by the coordinating board as necessary for the coordinating board to include information or calculate data required to be included in the institution's resumes; and

(2) ensure that the first frame of the institution's Internet website home page includes, in a font that is larger than the font of the majority of the text on the home page, an accessible link to the institution's online resumes maintained on the coordinating board's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51A.004. LINK TO FEDERAL STUDENT FINANCIAL AID INFORMATION. An institution may satisfy a requirement of this chapter relating to student loan, grant, or scholarship information by linking the online resume of the institution to that information as it appears on the website known as "College Navigator," or a successor or related website, maintained by the National Center for Education Statistics of the U.S. Department of Education.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. ONLINE INSTITUTION RESUMES FOR FOUR-YEAR GENERAL ACADEMIC TEACHING INSTITUTIONS

Sec. 51A.051. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to general academic teaching institutions, other than public state colleges.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51A.052. INSTITUTION RESUME FOR LEGISLATORS AND OTHER POLICY MAKERS. (a) The coordinating board shall maintain for each institution to which this subchapter applies an online resume that is designed for use by legislators and other interested policy makers.

(b) The resume required by this section must identify:

(1) the institutional grouping to which the institution is assigned under the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(2) the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions.

(c) For purposes of this section, information required to be included in the resume regarding the institution's in-state or out-of-state peer institutions must be listed in the form of the average of that information for those institutions unless otherwise prescribed by coordinating board rule.

(d) The resume must include the following information relating to the institution for the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available and compare that information to the same information for the state fiscal year preceding the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available and the state fiscal year preceding the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available by five years:

(1) under the heading "ENROLLMENT":

(A) the total number of students enrolled in the institution during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume; and

(B) the percentage of undergraduate students enrolled in the institution for the first time during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume who are transfer students;

(2) under the heading "COSTS":

(A) the average annual total academic costs for a resident undergraduate student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions;

(B) the percentage of undergraduate students receiving student loans:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions;

(C) the average annual amount of an undergraduate student's student loans:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions;

(D) the percentage of undergraduate students receiving federal or state grants:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions; and

(E) the average annual amount of federal and state grants received by an undergraduate student:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions;

(3) under the heading "STUDENT SUCCESS":

(A) the retention rate of first-time, full-time, degree-seeking entering undergraduate students:

(i) enrolled in the institution after one academic year and after two academic years; and

(ii) enrolled in the institution's in-state peer institutions after two academic years;

(B) the percentage of undergraduate students requiring developmental education who, after six years from entering the institution, graduated from or are still enrolled in:

(i) the institution; and

(ii) the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the four-year, five-year, and six-year graduation rates of full-time bachelor's degree-seeking students:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions; and

(D) the average number of fall and spring semesters of enrollment attempted by a student to obtain a bachelor's degree:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(4) under the heading "FUNDING":

(A) the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature to the institution, including money appropriated for faculty and staff health coverage and retirement benefits, for that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature represents;

(B) the total amount of federal funds from all federal sources, including grants and research funds, received by the institution in that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total amount of federal funds represents;

(C) the total academic costs charged to students by the institution in that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total academic costs represent; and

(D) the total amount of money from any source available to the institution in that state fiscal year.

(e) In addition to the information required by Subsection (d)(2), the resume must include under the heading "COSTS" the average annual amount and percentage by which the total academic costs charged to a resident undergraduate student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours have increased in each of the five most recent state fiscal years for which the information is available:

(1) at the institution; and

(2) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51A.053. INSTITUTION RESUME FOR PROSPECTIVE STUDENTS, PARENTS, AND MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC. (a) The coordinating board shall maintain for each institution to which this subchapter applies an online resume that is designed for use by prospective students of the institution, their parents, and other interested members of the public. A resume required for an institution under this section is not required to include information that the coordinating board considers to be substantially duplicative of information reported and available to the public through the Voluntary System of Accountability Program.

(b) The resume must identify:

(1) the institutional grouping to which the institution is assigned under the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(2) the institution's in-state peer institutions.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by the coordinating board under Subsection (a), the resume must include the following information relating to the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available:

(1) under the heading "ENROLLMENT":

(A) the total number of students enrolled in the institution during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume;

(B) the percentage of undergraduate students enrolled in the institution for the first time during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume who are transfer students; and

(C) a clearly identifiable link to the information described by Paragraph (A) disaggregated by student ethnicity;

(2) under the heading "DEGREES AWARDED":

(A) the number of bachelor's degrees, number of master's degrees, number of doctoral degrees, and number of professional degrees awarded by the institution; and

(B) a clearly identifiable link to the information described by Paragraph (A) disaggregated by student ethnicity;

(3) under the heading "COSTS":

(A) the average annual total academic costs for a resident undergraduate student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours at the institution;

(B) clearly identifiable links to information regarding:

(i) the rate or rates of tuition per semester credit hour charged by the institution; and

(ii) any mandatory fees, as defined by the coordinating board, imposed by the institution;

(C) the average cost of on-campus room and board per student; and

(D) the average cost to a resident undergraduate student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours for total academic costs and on-campus room and board, excluding the cost of books, supplies, transportation, or other expenses;

(4) under the heading "FINANCIAL AID":

(A) the percentage of undergraduate students enrolled in the institution who receive need-based grants or scholarships;

(B) the percentage of undergraduate students enrolled in the institution who receive need-based grants, scholarships, loans, or work-study funds;

(C) the percentage of undergraduate students enrolled in the institution who receive student loans;

(D) the average amount of an undergraduate student's need-based grant and scholarship package;

(E) the average amount of an undergraduate student's need-based grant, scholarship, loan, and work-study package; and

(F) the average amount of an undergraduate student's student loans;

(5) under the heading "ADMISSIONS":

(A) the middle 50 percent test score range of first-time undergraduate students at the institution whose Scholastic Assessment Test (SAT) scores were in the 25th to 75th percentile of students' scores at that institution;

(B) the middle 50 percent test score range of first-time undergraduate students at the institution whose American College Test (ACT) scores were in the 25th to 75th percentile of students' scores at that institution; and

(C) the percentage of the students who applied for first-time undergraduate admission to the institution who were offered admission to the institution;

(6) under the heading "INSTRUCTION":

(A) the student/faculty ratio at the institution;

(B) the percentage of organized undergraduate classes offered by the institution in which fewer than 20 students are enrolled;

(C) the percentage of organized undergraduate classes offered by the institution in which more than 50 students are enrolled; and

(D) the percentage of teaching faculty members of the institution who are tenured or tenure-track;

(7) under the heading "BACCALAUREATE SUCCESS":

(A) four-year, five-year, and six-year graduation rates for full-time bachelor's degree-seeking students at the institution, and links to that information disaggregated by student ethnicity;

(B) the average number of fall and spring semesters of enrollment attempted by a student to obtain a bachelor's degree; and

(C) the retention rate of first-time, full-time, degree-seeking entering undergraduate students enrolled in the institution after one academic year and after two academic years;

(8) under the heading "FIRST-TIME LICENSURE OR CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION PASS RATES," the first-time licensure or certification examination pass rates in the fields of education, law, pharmacy, nursing, and engineering of students enrolled in the institution or who have graduated from the institution; and

(9) under the heading "FUNDING":

(A) the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature to the institution, including money appropriated for faculty and staff health coverage and retirement benefits, for that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature represents;

(B) the total amount of federal funds from all federal sources, including grants and research funds, received by the institution in that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total amount of federal funds represents;

(C) the total academic costs charged to students by the institution in that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total academic costs represent; and

(D) the total amount of money from any source available to the institution in that state fiscal year.

(d) In addition to the information required by Subsection (c)(3), the resume must include under the heading "COSTS" the average annual amount and percentage by which the total academic costs charged to a resident undergraduate student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours have increased in each of the five most recent state fiscal years for which the information is available:

(1) at the institution; and

(2) at the institution's in-state peer institutions.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER C. INSTITUTION RESUMES FOR LOWER-DIVISION INSTITUTIONS

Sec. 51A.101. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to the following institutions of higher education:

(1) public junior colleges;

(2) public technical institutes; and

(3) public state colleges.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51A.102. INSTITUTION RESUME FOR LEGISLATORS AND OTHER POLICY MAKERS. (a) The coordinating board shall maintain for each institution to which this subchapter applies an online resume for the institution designed for use by legislators and other interested policy makers.

(b) The resume must identify:

(1) the institutional grouping to which the institution is assigned under the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(2) the institution's in-state peer institutions.

(c) For purposes of this section, information required to be included in the resume regarding the institution's in-state peer institutions must be listed in the form of the average of that information for those institutions unless otherwise prescribed by coordinating board rule.

(d) The resume must include the following information relating to the institution for the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available and compare that information to the same information for the state fiscal year preceding the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available and the state fiscal year preceding the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available by five years:

(1) under the heading "ENROLLMENT":

(A) the total number of students enrolled in the institution for course credit during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume;

(B) the percentage of students enrolled in the institution who are enrolled in one or more developmental education courses; and

(C) the percentage of students enrolled in the institution who are enrolled in one or more dual credit courses;

(2) under the heading "COSTS":

(A) the average annual total academic costs, which for a junior college must include those costs for an in-district and an out-of-district student, for a student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours toward a two-year degree or certificate:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(B) the percentage of students receiving student loans:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the average annual amount of student loans received by a student:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(D) the percentage of students receiving federal or state grants:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(E) the average annual amount of federal and state grants received by a student:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(3) under the heading "STUDENT SUCCESS":

(A) the retention rate of first-time, full-time, credential-seeking entering undergraduate students:

(i) enrolled in the institution after two academic years; and

(ii) enrolled in the institution's in-state peer institutions after two academic years;

(B) the percentage of undergraduate students requiring developmental education who, after three years from entering the institution, graduated from or are still enrolled in:

(i) the institution; and

(ii) the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the three-year, four-year, and six-year graduation rates of full-time credential-seeking students:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(D) the percentage of students who transferred to a general academic teaching institution or equivalent institution of higher education, as determined using the accountability system definition of a transfer student:

(i) from the institution; and

(ii) from the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(E) the percentage of graduates from the preceding academic year who, as of the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume, were either employed or enrolled in a general academic teaching institution or equivalent institution of higher education for:

(i) the institution; and

(ii) the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(4) under the heading "FUNDING":

(A) the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature to the institution, including money appropriated for faculty and staff health coverage and retirement benefits, for that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature represents;

(B) the total amount of money from any source available to the institution in that state fiscal year;

(C) the total amount of federal funds from all federal sources, including grants and research funds, received by the institution in that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total amount of federal funds represents;

(D) the total academic costs charged to students by the institution in that state fiscal year and the corresponding percentage of the institution's operating budget for that state fiscal year that the total academic costs represent; and

(E) the tax rate per $100 valuation of taxable property imposed by the junior college district, if the institution is a public junior college.

(e) In addition to the information required by Subsection (d)(2), the resume must include under the heading "COSTS" the average annual amount and percentage by which the total academic costs charged to a student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours toward a two-year degree or certificate have increased in each of the five most recent state fiscal years for which the information is available:

(1) at the institution; and

(2) at the institution's in-state peer institutions.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 945 (H.B. 736), Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 51A.103. INSTITUTION RESUME FOR PROSPECTIVE STUDENTS, PARENTS, AND OTHER MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC. (a) The coordinating board shall maintain for each institution to which this subchapter applies an online resume that is designed for use by prospective students of the institution, their parents, and other interested members of the public.

(b) The resume must identify:

(1) the institutional grouping to which the institution is assigned under the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(2) the institution's in-state peer institutions.

(c) For purposes of this section, information required to be included in the resume regarding the institution's in-state peer institutions must be listed in the form of the average of that information for those institutions unless otherwise prescribed by coordinating board rule.

(d) The resume must include the following information relating to the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available:

(1) under the heading "ENROLLMENT":

(A) the total number of students enrolled during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(B) a clearly identifiable link to information described by Paragraph (A) disaggregated by student ethnicity;

(2) under the heading "DEGREES AND CERTIFICATES AWARDED":

(A) the number of degrees or certificates awarded for each level, type, or other category of degree or certificate specified by the coordinating board for purposes of this paragraph:

(i) by the institution; and

(ii) by the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(B) a clearly identifiable link to the information described by Paragraph (A) disaggregated by student ethnicity;

(3) under the heading "COSTS," the average annual total academic costs, which for a junior college must include those costs for an in-district and out-of-district student, for a student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours toward a two-year degree:

(A) at the institution; and

(B) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(4) under the heading "FINANCIAL AID":

(A) the percentage of students who receive need-based grants or scholarships:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(B) the percentage of students who receive need-based grants, scholarships, loans, or work-study funds:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the average amount of a student's need-based grant and scholarship package:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(D) the average amount of a student's need-based grant, scholarship, loan, and work-study package:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(5) under the heading "STUDENT SUCCESS":

(A) the retention rate of first-time, full-time, credential-seeking entering undergraduate students:

(i) enrolled in the institution after two academic years; and

(ii) enrolled in the institution's in-state peer institutions after two academic years;

(B) the percentage of students requiring developmental education who, after three years from entering the institution, have graduated from or are still enrolled in:

(i) the institution; and

(ii) the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the three-year, four-year, and six-year graduation rates of full-time degree-seeking students:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(D) the percentage of students who transferred to a general academic teaching institution or equivalent institution of higher education, as determined using the accountability system definition of a transfer student:

(i) from the institution; and

(ii) from the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(E) the percentage of graduates from the preceding academic year who, as of the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume, were either employed or enrolled in a general academic teaching institution or equivalent institution of higher education for:

(i) the institution; and

(ii) the institution's in-state peer institutions.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER D. ONLINE INSTITUTION RESUMES FOR MEDICAL AND DENTAL UNITS

Sec. 51A.151. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER. This subchapter applies only to medical and dental units.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51A.152. INSTITUTION RESUME FOR LEGISLATORS AND OTHER POLICY MAKERS. (a) The coordinating board shall maintain for each institution to which this subchapter applies an online resume designed for use by legislators and other interested policy makers.

(b) The resume must identify:

(1) the institutional grouping to which the institution is assigned under the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(2) the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions.

(c) For purposes of this section, information required to be included in the resume regarding the institution's in-state or out-of-state peer institutions must be listed in the form of the average of that information for those institutions unless otherwise prescribed by coordinating board rule.

(d) The resume must include the following information relating to the institution for the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available and compare that information to the same information for the state fiscal year preceding the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available and the state fiscal year preceding the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available by five years:

(1) under the heading "ENROLLMENT":

(A) the total number of students enrolled in the institution during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume;

(B) if applicable, the total number of students enrolled in the institution's medical school during that fall semester; and

(C) if applicable, the total number of physicians certified by the institution annually on September 1 as training in residency programs accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association;

(2) under the heading "COSTS," the average annual total academic costs, including those costs identified by type of degree program if required by coordinating board rule, for a resident, full-time undergraduate student and for a resident, full-time graduate student:

(A) at the institution; and

(B) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions;

(3) under the heading "STUDENT SUCCESS":

(A) if applicable, the percentage of medical school students who pass Part 1 or Part 2 of any examination administered or accepted for a medical license under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions;

(B) if applicable, the percentage of medical school students who are practicing primary care in this state:

(i) after graduating from the institution; and

(ii) after graduating from the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the number of nursing degrees or allied health degrees awarded for each level:

(i) by the institution; and

(ii) by the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions; and

(D) the estimated total amount of the institution's research expenditures for the most recent state fiscal year available; and

(4) under the heading "FUNDING":

(A) the total amount of money appropriated by the legislature to the institution, including money appropriated for faculty and staff health coverage and retirement benefits, for that state fiscal year; and

(B) the total amount of money from any source available to the institution for that state fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 51A.153. INSTITUTION RESUME FOR PROSPECTIVE STUDENTS, PARENTS, AND OTHER MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC. (a) The coordinating board shall maintain for each institution to which this subchapter applies an online resume that is designed for use by prospective students of the institution, their parents, and other interested members of the public.

(b) The resume must identify:

(1) the institutional grouping to which the institution is assigned under the coordinating board's higher education accountability system; and

(2) the institution's in-state and out-of-state peer institutions.

(c) For purposes of this section, information required to be included in the resume regarding the institution's in-state peer institutions must be listed in the form of the average of that information for those institutions unless otherwise prescribed by coordinating board rules.

(d) The resume must include the following information relating to the most recent state fiscal year for which the information is available:

(1) under the heading "ENROLLMENT," with clearly identifiable links to the information disaggregated by student ethnicity:

(A) the total number of students enrolled in the institution during the fall semester that ended in the fiscal year covered by the resume;

(B) if applicable, the total number of students enrolled in the institution's medical school during that fall semester; and

(C) if applicable, the total number of physicians certified by the institution annually on September 1 as training in residency programs accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association at the institution on the most recent September 1 for which the information is available;

(2) under the heading "COSTS":

(A) the average annual total academic costs, including those costs identified by type of degree program if required by coordinating board rule, for a resident, full-time student at the institution;

(B) clearly identifiable links to information regarding:

(i) the tuition per academic year charged by the institution under Section 54.051;

(ii) any mandatory fees, as defined by the coordinating board, imposed by the institution; and

(iii) the amount and percentage by which the institution has increased tuition for a degree program or course level during the five state fiscal years preceding the state fiscal year covered by the resume; and

(C) the average cost to a resident undergraduate student enrolled in 30 semester credit hours for tuition and fees;

(3) under the heading "FINANCIAL AID":

(A) the percentage of graduate students enrolled in the institution who receive need-based grants or scholarships;

(B) the percentage of graduate students enrolled in the institution who receive need-based grants, scholarships, loans, or work-study funds;

(C) the average amount of a graduate student's need-based grant and scholarship package; and

(D) the average amount of a graduate student's need-based grant, scholarship, loan, and work-study package;

(4) under the heading "STUDENT SUCCESS":

(A) if applicable, the percentage of medical school students who pass Part 1 or Part 2 of any examination administered or accepted for a medical license under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code:

(i) at the institution; and

(ii) at the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(B) if applicable, the percentage of medical school students who are practicing primary care in this state:

(i) after graduating from the institution; and

(ii) after graduating from the institution's in-state peer institutions;

(C) the number of nursing degrees or allied health degrees awarded for each level:

(i) by the institution; and

(ii) by the institution's in-state peer institutions; and

(D) the estimated total amount of the institution's research expenditures; and

(5) under the heading "FIRST-TIME LICENSURE OR CERTIFICATION EXAMINATION PASS RATES," the first-time licensure or certification examination pass rates in applicable fields of students who are enrolled in or have graduated from:

(A) the institution; and

(B) the institution's in-state peer institutions.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 723 (S.B. 174), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.